Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-537
Annexation of territory by a city or village; effect on certain contracts.

Whenever any city or village annexes all the territory within the boundaries of any rural or suburban fire protection district authorized under Chapter 35, article 5, the district shall merge with the city or village and the city or village shall succeed to all the property and property rights of every kind, contracts, obligations, and choses in action of every kind, held by or belonging to the district, and the city or village shall be liable for and recognize, assume, and carry out all valid contracts and obligations of the district. All taxes, assessments, claims, and demands of every kind due or owing to the district shall be paid to and collected by the city or village. Nothing in this section shall authorize the annexing city or village to revoke any resolution, order, or finding made by the district in regard to special benefits or increase any assessments made by the district, but such city or village shall be bound by all such findings or orders and assessments to the same extent as the district would be bound.

Laws 2018, LB130, § 5.